Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-102
Elector, defined.

The term elector as used in sections 46-101 to 46-1,111 shall include any resident of the State of Nebraska, owning not less than fifteen acres of land, or who is an entryman of government land, within any district or proposed district, or any resident of the State of Nebraska holding a leasehold estate in not less than forty acres of state land within such district for a period of not less than five years from the date at which such elector seeks to exercise the elective franchise; Provided, however, when the elector is the owner of land in more than one division of the irrigation district and resides without the district, he shall be considered an elector in that division of the district in which the majority of his land is situated.

Laws 1913, c. 142, § 1, p. 343;

R.S.1913, § 3457;

Laws 1917, c. 80, § 1, p. 188;

C.S.1922, § 2857;

C.S.1929, § 46-101;

Laws 1937, c. 103, § 1, p. 362;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-101;

R.S.1943, § 46-102.